Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.030

Credential required—Counselors.

A person may not, as a part of his or her position as an employee of a state agency, practice counseling without being registered, certified, or licensed to practice as an agency affiliated counselor by the department under this chapter unless exempt under RCW 18.19.040.

[ 2023 c 425 s 14; 2008 c 135 s 2; 2001 c 251 s 19; 1991 c 3 s 20; 1987 c 512 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 425 ss 1-7, 13-20, and 22-26: See note following RCW 18.83.170.

Effective date—2008 c 135 ss 1, 2, 7-9, and 11-19: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Severability—2001 c 251: See RCW 18.225.900.